Utah statutes.
53-2a-504.   Emergency responder entering Utah to respond to an emergency.

An emergency responder who enters into Utah in response to a request for assistance by an official or emergency responder of Utah or pursuant to an agreement providing for interstate mutual aid is considered to be responding to an emergency.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 295, 2013 General Session

